North Carolina, session 2025, HB593.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 159-34 reads as rewritten:
"§ 159-34. Annual independent audit; rules and regulations.
(a) Each unit of local government and public authority shall have its accounts audited as
soon as possible after the close of each fiscal year by a certified public accountant or by an
accountant certified by the Commission as qualified to audit local government accounts. State
Auditor in accordance with subsection (b1) of this section. When specified by the secretary, the
audit shall evaluate the performance of a unit of local government or public authority with regard
to compliance with all applicable federal and State agency regulations. This audit, combined with
the audit of financial accounts, shall be deemed to be the single audit described by the "Federal
Single Audit Act of 1984".
(a1) The auditor shall be selected by and shall report directly to the governing board.board,
but in no instance may the governing board select an auditor not certified by the State Auditor as
qualified to audit the accounts of units of local government or public authorities. The governing
board shall solicit sealed bids for conducting the audit, which may be done annually but at least
once every five years. The governing board shall select an auditor from those sealed bids based
solely on cost, expertise, and time for completion of the audit and without information as to
identity of the bidder. If upon opening that sealed bid, the governing board determines that the
auditor cannot meet the audit schedule of the governing board or has performed inadequately on
a prior audit of the governing board, the governing board may reject that sealed bid and solicit
sealed bids again in accordance with this subsection.
(a2) The audit contract or agreement shall be comply with all of the following:
(i)(1) Be in writing, include writing.
(ii)(2) Include the entire entity in the scope of the audit, except that an audit for
purposes other than the annual audit required by this section should include
an accurate description of the scope of the audit, require audit.
(iii)(3) Require that a typewritten or printed report on the audit be prepared as set
forth herein, include required by this section.
(iv)(4) Include all of its terms and conditions, and be conditions.
*H593-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(v)(5) Be submitted to the secretary for his approval as to form, terms, conditions,
and compliance with the rules of the Commission.
(a3) As a minimum, the required audit report shall include the financial statements
prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, all disclosures in the
public interest required by law, and the auditor's opinion and comments relating to financial
statements. The audit shall be performed in conformity with generally accepted auditing
standards. The finance officer shall file a copy of the audit report with the secretary, and shall
submit all bills or claims for audit fees and costs to the secretary for his approval. Before giving
his approval the secretary shall determine that the audit and audit report substantially conform to
the requirements of this section. It shall be unlawful for any unit of local government or public
authority to pay or permit the payment of such the bills or claims without this approval.the
approval of the secretary.
(a4) Each officer and employee of the local government or local public authority having
custody of public money or responsibility for keeping records of public financial or fiscal affairs
shall produce all books and records requested by the auditor and shall divulge such the
information relating to fiscal affairs as he the auditor may request. If any member of a governing
board or any other public officer or employee shall conceal, falsify, or refuse to deliver or divulge
any books, records, or information, with an attempt thereby to mislead the auditor or impede or
interfere with the audit, he that individual is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.
(b) The Local Government Commission has authority to issue rules and regulations for
the purpose of improving the quality of auditing and the quality and comparability of reporting
pursuant to this section or any similar section of the General Statutes. The rules and regulations
may consider the needs of the public for adequate information and the performance that the
auditor has demonstrated in the past, and may be varied according to the size, purpose or function
of the unit, or any other criteria reasonably related to the purpose or substance of the rules or
regulation.
(b1) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, the State Auditor shall establish a
process for certified public accountants and accountants to become certified to conduct annual
audits under this section. Any certified public accountant or accountant certified to conduct
annual audits may be removed for cause.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except for Article 5A of Chapter 147 of
the General Statutes pertaining to the State Auditor, all State departments and agencies shall rely
upon the single audit accepted by the secretary as the basis for compliance with applicable federal
and State regulations. All State departments and agencies which provide funds to local
governments and public authorities shall provide the Commission with documents that the
Commission finds are in the prescribed format describing standards of compliance and suggested
audit procedures sufficient to give adequate direction to independent auditors retained by local
governments and public authorities to conduct a single audit as required by this section. The
secretary shall be responsible for the annual distribution of all such standards of compliance and
suggested audit procedures proposed by State departments and agencies and any amendments
thereto. amendments. Further, the Commission with the cooperation of all affected State
departments and agencies shall be responsible for the following:
(1) Procedures for the timely distribution of compliance standards developed by
State departments and agencies, reviewed and approved by the Commission
to auditors retained by local governments and public authorities.
(2) Procedures for the distribution of single audits for local governments and
public authorities such so that they are available to all State departments and
agencies which provide funds to local units.
(3) The acceptance of single audits on behalf of all State departments and
agencies; provided that, the secretary may subsequently revoke such the
acceptance for cause, whereupon affected State departments and agencies
Page 2 House Bill 593-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
shall no longer rely upon such the audit as the basis for compliance with
applicable federal and State regulations.
(d) Notwithstanding the requirement that the auditor is selected by and reports directly to
the governing board in subsection (a) subsection (a1) of this section, the Commission may require
the governing board of a local government or public authority that has been the subject of an
investigative audit with findings by the State Auditor, upon receipt of the investigative audit
report in accordance with G.S. 147-64.6(c)(14), to select the certified public accountant to
conduct the annual audit required by this section from a list of three certified public accountants
provided by the Commission. The Commission may instruct the Secretary secretary to issue a
request for proposals when selecting a certified public accountant under this subsection. Upon
exercise of this authority granted by this subsection, the certified public accountant auditor shall
report directly to the Commission and governing board, shall comply with all rules of the
Commission, and shall be paid by the governing board. The Commission may exercise the
authority granted by this subsection for up to three fiscal years after the release of the
investigative report with findings by the State Auditor.
(e) The secretary shall provide a notice of noncompliance to each county or municipality
unit of local government or public authority that fails to submit an annual audit report as required
under subsection (a) of this section within nine months of the county or municipality's fiscal year
end. The notice shall be sent to the governing board by first-class mail at the county or
municipality's to the primary mailing address. address on record with the Commission. The notice
shall be issued within 30 days following nine months after the county or municipality's fiscal
year end. A county or municipality that fails to comply with the notice of noncompliance and to
complete the annual audit required under subsection (a) of this section within 12 months of its
fiscal year end shall be deemed to have given consent to the withholding of a portion of its sales
tax distributions, as provided in subsection (g) of this section.
(f) Upon receiving a notice of noncompliance under subsection (e) of this section, a
county or municipality may notify the secretary in writing that it plans to appeal the action and
the county or municipality will be scheduled to appear before the Commission at its next
regularly scheduled meeting. The written notice shall state the basis for the appeal and include
any evidence to support the appeal. The Commission shall establish guidelines outlining specific
criteria that would warrant a successful appeal. If a county or municipality appeals prior to the
secretary taking action to withhold under subsection (g) of this section, the secretary must delay
withholding if the Commission determines that the county or municipality has provided sufficient
evidence that the failure to provide a copy of their the annual audit report required by subsection
(a) of this section is due to circumstances within the guidelines established by the Commission.
If the county or municipality appeals after the secretary takes action to withhold under subsection
(g) of this section, the secretary must notify the Secretary of Revenue to release any funds
withheld under subsection (g) of this section if the Commission determines that the county or
municipality has provided sufficient evidence that the failure to provide a copy of their the annual
audit report required by subsection (a) of this section is due to circumstances within the
guidelines established by the Commission.
(g) A county or municipality that fails to file a copy of its annual audit report as required
by subsection (a) of this section with the secretary within 12 months of its fiscal year end may
have a portion of its sales tax distributions withheld. The total cumulative amount that may be
withheld is an amount equal to one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the cost of the required annual
audit as indicated in the audit contract between the county or municipality and its external auditor
for the audit report, if such a contract has been executed, or one hundred fifty percent (150%) of
the actual fee for the most recently filed audit report if a contract has not been executed for the
current year audit.
The Secretary of Revenue must withhold from the county or municipality's distribution under
G.S. 105-486, and from the county or municipality's distribution under G.S. 105-501 if
House Bill 593-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
necessary, the amount required to be withheld upon written notification to do so from the
secretary. The notifications must be made on a quarterly basis. The amount to be withheld is five
percent (5%) of one-twelfth of the county or municipality's annual general fund budget as it was
adopted at the beginning of the fiscal year in which the withholding begins until the total
cumulative withholding amount is reached. The total cumulative amount to be withheld and any
schedule of withholding shall be provided by the secretary in its notification to the Secretary of
Revenue. The Secretary of Revenue shall begin withholding from the county or municipality's
first distribution of sales and use tax that is at least 45 days after they receive notification from
the secretary.
(h) When the annual audit report required under by subsection (a) of this section has been
filed with the secretary, reviewed to ensure compliance with the requirements of this section, and
accepted by the secretary or an appeal was successful under subsection (f) of this section, the
secretary must notify the Secretary of Revenue within 30 days to release the funds. The
Department of Revenue must release the funds in the county or municipality's first scheduled
distribution of sales tax that is at least 45 days after the earlier of the following:
(1) Two years from the date of notification for the funds to be withheld.
(2) The date the Secretary of Revenue receives notification from the secretary that
either (i) a report complying with the requirements of this section was filed
and accepted by the secretary or (ii) the county or municipality has
successfully appealed action taken under subsection (g) of this section.
(i) The secretary shall report annually to the Commission and the General Assembly a
list of the units of local government and public authorities failing to complete and report to the
Commission, in a timely fashion, two or more consecutive annual audits as required by
subsection (a) of this section."
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 115C-447 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-447. Annual independent audit.
(a) Each local school administrative unit shall have its accounts and the accounts of
individual schools therein audited as soon as possible after the close of each fiscal year by a
certified public accountant or by an accountant certified by the Local Government Commission
State Auditor in accordance with subsection (e) of this section as qualified to audit local
government accounts. The auditor who audits the accounts of a local school administrative unit
shall also audit the accounts of its individual schools.
(a1) The auditor shall be selected by and shall report directly to the board of education. In
no instance may the governing board select an auditor not certified by the State Auditor as
qualified to audit local government accounts. The board of education shall solicit bids for
conducting the audit by sealed bid, which may be done annually but at least once every five years.
The board of education shall select an auditor from those sealed bids based solely on cost,
expertise, and time for completion of the audit and without information as to identity of the
bidder. If upon opening that sealed bid, the board of education determines that the auditor cannot
meet the audit schedule of the board of education or has performed inadequately on a prior audit
of the board of education, the board of education may reject that sealed bid and solicit sealed bids
again in accordance with this subsection.
(a2) The audit contract shall be in writing, shall include all its terms and conditions, and
shall be submitted to the Secretary secretary of the Local Government Commission for his
approval as to form, terms and conditions. The terms and conditions of the audit contract shall
include the scope of the audit, and the requirement that upon completion of the examination the
auditor shall prepare a typewritten or printed report embodying financial statements and his the
auditor's opinion and comments relating thereto.comments.
(a3) The financial statements accompanying the auditor's report shall be prepared in
conformity with generally accepted accounting principles. The auditor shall file a copy of the
audit report with the Secretary secretary of the Local Government Commission, the State Board
Page 4 House Bill 593-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
of Education, the board of education and the board of county commissioners, and shall submit
all bills or claims for audit fees and costs to the Secretary secretary of the Local Government
Commission for his approval. It shall be unlawful for any local school administrative unit to pay
or permit the payment of such the bills or claims without this approval.the approval of the
secretary of the Commission.
(a4) Each officer, employee and agent of the local school administrative unit having
custody of public money or responsibility for keeping records of public financial or fiscal affairs
shall produce all books and records requested by the auditor and shall divulge such the
information relating to fiscal affairs as he may request. be requested. If any member of a board
of education or any other public officer, employee or agent shall conceal, falsify, or refuse to
deliver or divulge any books, records, or information, with an intent thereby to mislead the
auditor or impede or interfere with the audit, he that individual is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.
(a5) The State Auditor shall have authority to prescribe the manner in which funds
disbursed by administrative units by warrants on the State Treasurer shall be audited.
(b) When the State Board of Education finds that incidents of fraud, embezzlement, theft,
or management failures in a local school administrative unit make it appropriate to review the
internal control procedures of the unit, the State Board of Education shall so notify the unit. If
the incidents were discovered by the firm performing the audit under subsection (a) of this
section, the board of the local school administrative unit shall submit the audit together with a
plan for any corrective actions relative to its internal control procedures to the State Board of
Education and the Local Government Commission for approval and shall implement the
approved changes prior to the next annual audit. Where the firm preparing the audit under
subsection (a) of this section identifies significant problems with internal control procedures the
local school administrative unit shall submit the audit together with a plan for any corrective
actions relative to its internal control procedures to the State Board of Education and the Local
Government Commission for approval and shall implement the approved changes prior to the
next annual audit.
(c) If the incidents were not discovered by the firm performing the audit under subsection
(a) of this section, the State Board of Education and the Local Government Commission shall
employ an audit firm to review the internal control procedures of that local school administrative
unit. Upon completion of this review, the audit firm shall report publicly to the State Board of
Education, the Local Government Commission, and the board of the local school administrative
unit. If the State Board of Education determines that significant changes are needed in the internal
control procedures of the local school administrative unit, the local board shall submit a plan of
corrective actions to the State Board of Education and the Local Government Commission for
approval and shall implement the approved changes prior to the next annual audit. The local
school administrative unit shall pay the cost of this audit.
(d) The Commission has authority to issue rules and regulations for the purpose of
improving the quality of auditing and the quality and comparability of reporting pursuant to this
section or any similar section of the General Statutes. The rules and regulations may consider the
needs of the public for adequate information and the performance that the auditor has
demonstrated in the past and may be varied according to the size, purpose, or function of the unit,
or any other criteria reasonably related to the purpose or substance of the rules or regulations.
(e) The State Auditor shall establish a process for certified public accountants and
accountants to become certified to conduct annual audits under this section. Any certified public
accountant or accountant certified to conduct annual audits may be removed for cause.
(f) The secretary shall report annually to the Commission and the General Assembly a
list of the local school administrative units failing to complete and report to the Commission, in
a timely fashion, two or more consecutive annual audits as required by this section."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 115C-423 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(3m) "Commission" is the Local Government Commission."
House Bill 593-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. There is appropriated the sum of three million five hundred twenty
thousand dollars ($3,520,000) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to the State
Auditor to create a financial administration program. This program shall provide the resources
to employ 32 additional finance professionals to assist small local governments and public
authorities with returning to a compliant status, with priority for local governments and public
authorities with limited means and those local governments or public authorities on the Unit
Assistance List published by the Local Government Commission annually.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies to audits
conducted on or after that date.
Page 6 House Bill 593-First Edition